Massachusetts, session 194th, H4823.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General 
Laws, or any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset 
management and maintenance may convey to the town of Tewksbury, for use as a cemetery, a 
certain parcel of land being approximately 11.019 acres previously conveyed to the department 
of public health by deed recorded November 23, 1979 at the Middlesex north registry of deeds in 
book 2396, page 686 and shown as “parcel 62-19-3" on a plan of land on file with the division of 
capital asset management and maintenance entitled “Approval not Required Plan in the Town of 
Tewksbury, Massachusetts Middlesex County Owned by Commonwealth of Massachusetts 
Prepared for the Division of Capital Asset Management on Behalf of the Department of 
Conservation and Recreation”, dated September 12, 2012 and prepared by Nitsch Engineering, 
Inc.  
(b) Prior to finalizing the transaction or making the conveyance authorized in subsection 
(a), the division of capital asset management and maintenance may make minor modifications to 

of 3 14 the area and plan in order to carry out the purposes of this section. The commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance shall establish the fair market value of the property for both 
the highest and best use of the property as currently encumbered and for the purposes described 
in subsection (a).  
(c) Consideration for the parcel described in subsection (a) shall be fair market value of 
the parcel or the fair market value for the restricted use. If the consideration for the parcel 
conveyed in subsection (a) is less than fair market value, the commissioner shall place notice in 
the central register of the conveyance identifying the amount of the transaction and the difference 
between the calculated value and the price received.   
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, may convey to the town of 
Tewksbury, for recreational use, a certain parcel of land 0.517 acres and previously conveyed to 
the department of public health by deed recorded November 23, 1979 at the Middlesex north 
registry of deeds at book 2396, page 686 and shown as parcel “62-19-2" on a plan of land on file 
with the division of capital asset management and maintenance entitled “Approval not Required 
Plan in the Town of Tewksbury, Massachusetts Middlesex County Owned by Commonwealth of 
Massachusetts Prepared for the Division of Capital Asset Management on Behalf of the 
Department of Conservation and Recreation”, dated September 12, 2012 and prepared by Nitsch 
Engineering, Inc.   
(b) Prior to finalizing the transaction or making the conveyance authorized in, the 
division of capital asset management and maintenance may make minor modifications to the area 
and plan in order to carry out the purposes of this section. The commissioner of capital asset 

of 3 36 management and maintenance shall establish the value of the property for both the highest and 
best use of the property as currently encumbered and for the purposes described in subsection 
(a).  
(c) Consideration for the parcel described in subsection (a) shall be the fair market value 
of the parcel or the fair market value for the restricted use. If the consideration for the parcel 
conveyed in subsection (a) is less than fair market value, the commissioner shall place notice in 
the central register of the conveyance identifying the amount of the transaction and the difference 
between the calculated value and price received.   
SECTION 3. The town of Tewksbury shall assume all reasonable costs associated with 
engineering, surveys, appraisals, deed preparation and other expenses deemed necessary by the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance for the conveyances authorized in 
sections 1 and 2.